Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.07.060

Bonds—Special obligations—Payment—Funds—Segregation of proceeds and moneys.

Bonds issued under this chapter shall not be deemed to constitute obligations, either general or special, of the state or of any political subdivision of the state, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any political subdivision, or a general obligation of the authority. The bonds shall be special obligations of the authority and shall be payable solely from the special fund or funds created by the authority in the bond resolution or trust indenture pursuant to which the bonds were issued. The fund or funds shall be funded in whole or in part from moneys paid by one or more participants for whose benefit the bonds were issued, from the sources, if any, under RCW 28B.07.040(9), or from the proceeds of bonds issued by the authority for the purpose of refunding any outstanding bonds of the authority. The issuance of bonds under this chapter shall not obligate, directly, indirectly, or contingently, the state or any political subdivision of the state to levy any taxes or appropriate or expend any funds for the payment of the principal or the interest on the bonds.

Neither the proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter, any moneys used or to be used to pay the principal of or interest on the bonds, nor any moneys received by the authority to defray its administrative costs shall constitute public money or property. All of such moneys shall be kept segregated and set apart from funds of the state and any political subdivision of the state and shall not be subject to appropriation or allotment by the state or subject to the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.

[ 1983 c 169 s 6.]